Utah statutes.
78B-6-314.   Re-entry after eviction from real property.

(1)  A person who is ordered to vacate real property by a court of competent jurisdiction, who, not having a right so to do, refuses to vacate, re-enters, or takes possession of, the real property, is guilty of a contempt of the court issuing the judgment.

(2)  Upon a conviction for the contempt, the court shall immediately issue an alias process, directed to the proper officer, requiring the person to restore possession of the property to the party entitled to possession under the original judgment or process.

